Washington statutes.
RCW 18.47.030

Competency-based requirements—Administration—Fees.

(1) The secretary shall:

(a) In collaboration with community partners who advance equitable access to improve perinatal outcomes and care through holistic services for black and brown communities, adopt rules establishing the competency-based requirements that a birth doula must meet to obtain certification. The rules must establish processes that allow for applicants to meet the competency-based requirements through the following pathways:

(i) Successful completion of training and education programs approved by the secretary; and

(ii) Submission of proof of successful completion of culturally congruent ancestral practices, training, and education that the secretary must review and determine whether the training and education meet the competency-based requirements;

(b) Establish certification and renewal fees, administrative procedures, continuing education, administrative requirements, and forms necessary to implement this chapter in accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280;

(c) Maintain a record of all applicants and certifications under this chapter; and

(d) Hire clerical, administrative, and investigative staff as needed to implement and administer this chapter.

(2) All fees collected under this chapter must be credited to the health professions account as required under RCW 43.70.320.

[ 2022 c 217 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 217 ss 1-5: See note following RCW 18.47.010.